test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/V-II-miywasin_gt-norm.yaml
Condfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - miywâsin - help : # Wolvengrey VIIn
   
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg:  miywâsin
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl:  miywâsinwa
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg:  miywâsiniyiw
     miywâsin+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl:  miywâsiniyiwa
     
     PV/e+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg:  [ê-miywâsik, êmiywâsik]
     PV/e+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl:  [ê-miywâsiki, êmiywâsiki]
     PV/e+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg:  [ê-miywâsiniyik, êmiywâsiniyik]
     PV/e+miywâsin+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl:  [ê-miywâsiniyiki, êmiywâsiniyiki]
     
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Sg:  miywâsiki
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+3Pl:  miywâsikwâwi
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Sg:  miywâsiniyiki
     miywâsin+V+II+Fut+Cond+4Pl:  miywâsiniyikwâwi
